Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 2 Consolidation, Merger, Surrender of Franchise, and Dissolution of Companies

46-8-70.
Application by railroad company that company surrender its franchises and cease performing as a common carrier; hearing before commission; effect of outstanding debts on company.

Any railroad corporation chartered by the Secretary of State and owning and operating in this state any railroad, other than a street railroad, not over five miles long may cease, temporarily or permanently, to exercise its franchises and to perform its duties as a common carrier and may surrender its franchises to the state by order of the commission.

Before any such order under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be granted, such corporation shall file with the commission an application for the same, verified by the affidavit of the president and secretary of such corporation, containing a copy of a resolution adopted by a unanimous vote of the stockholders of such corporation authorizing such application.

The commission shall fix a date for the hearing of such application, and before such date such application shall be published once a week for four weeks in the official organ of each county through which said railroad may run.

The commission shall have authority to investigate fully the matter of such application and to grant such an order if it concludes that the condition of the affairs of such corporation and the public convenience warrant it. No such railroad company shall be allowed to surrender its franchises as provided in this Code section so long as it owes any debts whatever.

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 211, §§ 1-4; Code 1933, §§ 94-324, 94-325, 94-326, 94-327.

46-8-71.
Dissolution of railroad corporation generally.

A railroad corporation which is organized under the laws of this state and chartered by the Secretary of State and which has surrendered its franchises to the state in accordance with Code Section 46-8-70 or which has sold its property, rights, and franchises to another corporation in accordance with Code Section 46-8-106, and which has satisfied all its outstanding debts and obligations, or which has arranged for all its outstanding debts and obligations to be assumed by the transferee of its property, rights, and franchises, may be dissolved in the manner provided in Code Sections 46-8-72 through 46-8-79.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Code Section 46-8-106, referred to in this Code section, was repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 2/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

46-8-72.
Adoption of resolution for dissolution by board of directors; meeting of stockholders to consider resolution; filing of petition for dissolution with Secretary of State.

If the board of directors of a railroad corporation organized under the laws of this state deems it desirable that the corporation be dissolved, the board of directors may adopt a resolution to that effect and may call a meeting of the stockholders having voting powers to consider a proposal to dissolve and to take action upon the resolution so adopted. Such meeting of the stockholders shall be held upon notice given in the manner provided in Code Section 46-8-46 for notice of organization meetings of railroad corporations or upon written waiver of notice. If at such meeting or any adjournment thereof the holders of record of two-thirds of all the stock entitled to vote thereon determine that the dissolution should take place, a petition for dissolution shall be filed in triplicate with the Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 2.

46-8-73.
Contents of petition for dissolution; certification resolution recommending dissolution; attachment of resolution to petition; verification of petition; fee for filing petition.

The petition for dissolution shall include:

The name of the corporation;

The date upon which its charter was granted;

A statement that it no longer is possessed of any franchises to operate in this or any other state;

A statement that all of its debts, liabilities, and obligations have been satisfied or that such debts, liabilities, and obligations have been assumed by the transferee of its property, rights, and franchises; and

A statement that the transfer or surrender of its franchises has been completed in accordance with an order of the Public Service Commission.

A copy of the stockholders’ resolution recommending dissolution shall be certified by the secretary of the corporation and attached to the petition. The petition shall be verified by the president and the treasurer of the corporation.

On filing the petition, the corporation shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $100.00 to be deposited by him into the general fund of the state treasury.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-8-74.
Advertisement of petition for dissolution.

When the petition for dissolution is filed, the Secretary of State shall certify one of the copies thereof and shall deliver the same to the corporation, which shall cause the certified copy to be published once a week for four weeks in the official organ of the county in which the corporation has its principal office.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 4.

46-8-75.
Transfer of copy of petition from Secretary of State to commission.

Immediately upon the filing of the petition for dissolution, the Secretary of State shall transmit one copy thereof to the Public Service Commission for investigation.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-8-76.
Investigation by commission of proposed dissolution; issuance of certificate approving or disapproving application for dissolution; transfer of certificate; filing of duplicate certificate; effect of disapproval.

Upon receipt of the copy of the petition for dissolution, the commission shall immediately investigate or cause an investigation to be made, and shall satisfy itself that:

The surrender of the franchise and charter and the dissolution of the corporation may be allowed without injustice to any stockholder or to any person or corporation having any claim or demand of any character against the corporation seeking dissolution;

That creditors are paid or properly provided for;

That the surrender of the charter and franchises has been authorized by proper corporate action; and

That all requirements of law have been complied with.

Within 30 days after the copy of the petition for dissolution has been filed with the commission, the commission shall issue under its hand and official seal a certificate either approving or disapproving the application, depending upon the results of the investigation, and shall transmit a copy of the certificate to the Secretary of State, who shall enter the same of record in his office. The commission shall also keep on file a duplicate of the certificate in its own office.

If the commission does not approve the application, no order shall be granted by the Secretary of State dissolving the corporation or authorizing the surrender of its charter.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 6.

46-8-77.
Certification by judge of the probate court of the fact of advertisement of petition; filing of certificate with Secretary of State.

When the copy of the petition for dissolution has been published as required by Code Section 46-8-74, the corporation may apply to the judge of the probate court of the county in which its principal office is situated for certification of the fact of such publication, and the judge shall certify the fact. The certificate shall thereupon be filed by the corporation in the office of the Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 7.

46-8-78.
Order of Secretary of State accepting surrender of charter and franchises and dissolving corporation; recording of petition, certificate of approval, certificate of publication, and order by Secretary of State.

When the certificate of the judge of the probate court is filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to Code Section 46-8-77, and when the certificate of the Public Service Commission approving the application is likewise filed with the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall pass an order under the seal of the state accepting the surrender of the charter and franchises and dissolving the corporation. The Secretary of State shall record the petition for dissolution, the certificate of approval of the Public Service Commission, the certificate of the judge of the probate court as to the publication, and an order accepting the surrender of the charter and franchises and dissolving the corporation named in the order.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-8-79.
Effect of issuance of order of dissolution and payment of fees.

After the order of dissolution has been issued, and after all fees for filing and certificates have been paid, the corporation shall be dissolved and shall have no further existence, except as provided in Code Section 14-4-161.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 213, § 9.

46-8-80.
Contracts between railroad companies for merger, consolidation, lease, or purchase for purposes of connecting the roads of the companies.

Any railroad company incorporated under this chapter shall have the power to make contracts with any other railroad company which has constructed or hereafter constructs any railroad within this state for the purpose of enabling the companies to run their roads in connection with each other and merge their stocks, or to consolidate with each other, or to lease or purchase property and to hold, use, and occupy the same in such manner as they may deem most beneficial to their interests, provided that no railroad shall purchase a competing line of railroad or enter into any contract with a competing line of railroad calculated to defeat or lessen competition in this state. Any violation of this Code section shall subject the corporation to all the penalties incident to such violation of the law.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 13; Civil Code 1895, § 2173; Civil Code 1910, § 2591; Code 1933, § 94-311.

46-8-81.
Consolidation, merger, lease, or purchase of railroad companies whose roads form a continuous line; issuance of stocks and bonds by consolidated companies.

Any railroad company incorporated under this chapter shall have authority to sell, lease, assign, or transfer its stock, property, and franchises to, or to consolidate the same with those of, any other railroad company which is incorporated under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States and whose railroad within this state connects with or forms a continuous line with the railroad of the company incorporated under this chapter, upon such terms as may be agreed upon. Conversely, any such corporation organized under this chapter may purchase, lease, consolidate with, absorb, and merge into itself the stock, property, and franchises of any other railroad company incorporated under the laws of this or any other state or the United States whose railroad within this state connects with or forms a continuous line or system with the railroad of such company incorporated under this chapter upon such terms as may be agreed upon.

Any railroad corporation formed by the consolidation of one or more railroad corporations, organized under the laws of this state or under the laws of this state and any other states, with one or more corporations, organized under the laws of any other state or under the laws of this and of other states, may issue stocks and bonds as provided for in this chapter in such amounts as it may deem necessary for the purpose of paying, or exchanging the same for, or retiring, any bonds or stocks theretofore issued by either of the corporations so merged, purchased, or consolidated, or for any other purpose. Such stocks and bonds may be issued to the amount authorized by the laws of the state under which either of the corporations so consolidated was organized. Any bonds issued by the corporation may be secured by mortgage or trust deeds upon its real or personal property, franchises, rights, and privileges, whether within or without this state.

No railroad company shall make any contract under this Code section with any other railroad company which is a competing line if such contract is calculated to defeat or lessen competition in this state or to encourage monopoly.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 18; Civil Code 1895, § 2179; Civil Code 1910, § 2597; Code 1933, § 94-318.

46-8-82.
Forfeiture of powers, privileges, and certificate of incorporation for failure to construct and operate 15 miles of road within three years; extension of time for construction and operation of road.

All the powers and privileges and the certificate of incorporation of a railroad company shall be forfeited at the expiration of three years from the date of the certificate if at the expiration of those three years the company has not constructed and equipped the road, and is not operating the same, for at least 15 miles, or for the entire length of the road if the same is less than 15 miles long, provided that the Secretary of State, for cause shown, may relieve against any forfeiture provided for in this Code section and extend the time of construction, equipment, and operation of said 15 miles of road, or of the entire length of the road if the same is less than 15 miles long, in favor of any such railroad company. Such relief shall not be granted unless applied for within one year after cause for forfeiture has arisen.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 8; Civil Code 1895, § 2166; Ga. L. 1903, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1910, p. 109, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2584; Ga. L. 1913, p. 32, § 1; Code 1933, § 94-302.